dev/pronoun/pronoun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="/Prpers__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমার</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমাতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমি</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমায়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমাকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমরা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আমাদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমার</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমাতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তুমি</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমায়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমাকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমরা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোমাদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তুই</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোরা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তোদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনার</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনি</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনাকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনারা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনাদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আপনাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এগুলোতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐগুলোতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐগুলোয়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওগুলোতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওগুলোয়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এরা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এগুলো</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐগুলো</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐসব</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওরা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওগুলো</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এগুলোয়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এগুলোকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐগুলোকে</l>

    <e lm="Prpers"><i></i><par n="/Prpers__prn"/></e>
